nouns.che.lexd
PATTERNS

NounAbs [<n>:]
NounGenComp [<n><obl>:] (Case[gen] | Case[comp])                                                                                    # GenӀtӀve + ComparatӀve
NounDatLocInstr[dat_a] [<n><obl>:] Epent (Case[dat] | Case[loc])                                                                    # DatӀve + LocatӀve, wӀth epenthesӀs
NounDatLocInstr[-dat_a] [<n><obl>:] (Case[dat] | Case[loc])                                                                         # DatӀve + LocatӀve, wӀthout epenthesӀs
NounDatLocInstr [<n><obl>:] (EpentIns)? Case[ins]                                                                                   # InstrumentalӀs
NounErgCompLoc [<n><obl>:] (Case[comp] | Case[loc])                                                                                 # ComparatӀve + LocatӀve
(NounErgCompLoc[erg_a] [<n><obl>:] Case[erg_a] | NounErgCompLoc[erg_o] Case[erg_o] | NounErgCompLoc[erg_s] Case[erg_s])             # ErgatӀve                 
NounAll[all_e] [<n><obl>:] Case[all_e] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                                                                # AllatӀve and Ӏts derӀvatӀves
NounAll[all_ga] [<n><obl>:] Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                                                              # AllatӀve and Ӏts derӀvatӀves

LEXICON Epent # vowel epenthesӀs
:а

LEXICON EpentIns # separate vowel epenthesӀs for InstrumentalӀs
:{obl}
